Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1004
Terms, defined.

As used in this section and section 28-1005, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Bearbaiting shall mean the pitting of any animal against a bear;

(2) Cockfighting shall mean the pitting of a fowl against another fowl;

(3) Dogfighting shall mean the pitting of a dog against another dog; and

(4) Pitting shall mean bringing animals together in combat.

Laws 1988, LB 170, § 2.